Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.200

Costs.

The execution creditor must pay the costs of these proceedings in the first instance; but in the cases provided for in RCW 6.13.150 and 6.13.160 the amount so paid must be added as costs on execution, and collected accordingly.

[ 1987 c 442 s 220; 1895 c 64 s 23; RRS s 551. Formerly RCW 6.12.280.]